District of Columbia statutes.
8-111.05

Inspection and investigation.

The Mayor is authorized to conduct an on-site inspection of any asbestos abatement project to determine compliance with all federal and District laws or rules applicable to asbestos abatement. The Mayor is authorized to investigate any report of noncompliance with the federal and District laws or rules applicable to asbestos abatement.

May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-116, § 6, 37 DCR 1641
1981 Ed., § 6-991.5.